Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-402 Duplicate document of title;
overissue. A duplicate or any other document of title purporting to cover
goods already represented by an outstanding document of the same issuer does
not confer any right in the goods, except as provided in the case of tangible
bills of lading in a set of parts, overissue of documents for fungible goods,
substitutes for lost, stolen, or destroyed documents, or substitute documents
issued pursuant to section 490:7-105. The issuer is liable for damages caused
by its overissue or failure to identify a duplicate document by a conspicuous
notation. [L 2004, c 163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next